Hawaii statutes.
§195-9 Natural area reserve fund;
heritage program; established. (a) There is hereby established in the
state treasury a special fund known as the natural area reserve fund to
implement the purposes of this chapter, including the identification, establishment,
and management of natural area reserves, the acquisition of private lands for
new natural area reserves, the operation of the heritage program, and the
provision of matching funds for the natural area partnership program. The fund
shall be administered by the department.

(b) The fund shall consist of moneys received
from any public or private sources. The fund shall be held separate and apart
from all other moneys, funds, and accounts in the state treasury, except that
any moneys received from the federal government or from private contributions
shall be deposited and accounted for in accordance with conditions established
by the agencies or persons from whom the moneys are received. Investment
earnings credited to the assets of the fund shall become a part of the assets
of the fund. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year
shall be carried forward in the fund for the next fiscal year. [L 1987, c 351,
§1; am L 1988, c 32, §1; am L 1991, c 326, §4]

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Biological survey;
designation, see §6E-61.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next